Washington statutes.
RCW 43.115.030

Membership—Terms—Vacancies—Travel expenses—Quorum.

(1) The commission shall consist of eleven members of Hispanic origin appointed by the governor. To the extent practicable, appointments to the commission shall be made to achieve a balanced representation based on the Hispanic population distribution within the state, geographic considerations, sex, age, and occupation. Members shall serve three-year terms. No member shall serve more than two full consecutive terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

(2) Members shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

(3) Six members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business.

[ 1993 c 261 s 2; 1987 c 249 s 3; 1981 c 338 s 15; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 130; 1971 ex.s. c 34 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.